Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.040

Public discussion by candidate for public office. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

Prior to declaring as a candidate for public office or while campaigning for public office as defined by RCW 42.17A.005 no public discussion or expression of an opinion by a person subsequently elected to a public office, on any pending or proposed quasi-judicial actions, shall be a violation of the appearance of fairness doctrine.

[ 2011 c 60 s 27; 1982 c 229 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 42.36.040

Public discussion by candidate for public office. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Prior to declaring as a candidate for public office or while campaigning for public office as defined by RCW 29B.10.440 no public discussion or expression of an opinion by a person subsequently elected to a public office, on any pending or proposed quasi-judicial actions, shall be a violation of the appearance of fairness doctrine.

[ 2024 c 164 s 512; 2011 c 60 s 27; 1982 c 229 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.